Arkansas, session 2025, SB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
established for the Department of Finance and Administration - Assessment
Coordination Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U085U ACD DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) D068C INFORMATION SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(3) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
*JAP006*
01/07/2025 11:02:38 AM JAP006

SB43
(4) R041C DFA STATEWIDE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(5) X046C ACD DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR 4 GRADE GS08
(6) E031C EDUCATION PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(7) X049C PROPERTY ASSESSMENT COORD MANAGER 5 GRADE GS07
(8) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(9) X079C PROPERTY ASSESSMENT AUDITOR SUPERVISOR 11 GRADE GS06
(10) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(11) X117C PROPERTY ASSESSMENT AUDITOR 6 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 33

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Finance and Administration - Assessment Coordination
Division for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: three (3) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Assessment Coordination Division - State Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,756,225
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,500
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 664,956
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 872,240
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 49,869
(C) PROF. FEES 10,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/07/2025 11:02:38 AM JAP006

SB43
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) ASSESSOR'S SCHOOL 325,000
(06) ASSESSMENT EDUC INCENTIVE 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,830,790

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Finance and
Administration - Assessment Coordination Division - Cash for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $33,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 12,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $55,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY ASSESSORS' CONTINUING EDUCATION FUND.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the County Assessors' Continuing Education
Trust Fund, for maintaining and operating a continuing education program for
County Assessors by the Department of Finance and Administration - Assessment
Coordination Division - County Assessors' Continuing Education Fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $44,100
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,500
(C) PROF. FEES 8,400
01/07/2025 11:02:38 AM JAP006

SB43
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $60,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - REAL PROPERTY REAPPRAISAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Arkansas Real Property Reappraisal Fund, for paying counties and
professional reappraisal companies for the cost of reappraisal of real
property by the Department of Finance and Administration - Assessment
Coordination Division - Real Property Reappraisal for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REAL PROPERTY REAPPRAISAL $15,750,000

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER. To provide funding for the appropriations authorized herein, the
Director of the Department of Finance and Administration - Assessment
Coordination Division of the State of Arkansas shall certify monthly to the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the amount of funding needed each month to
pay counties and professional reappraisal companies for the reappraisal of
real property as required by law. Upon receipt of such certification the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her books and
those of the State Treasurer 76% of the amounts certified from the Department
of Education Public School Fund Account, 16% of the amount certified from the
County Aid Fund, and 8% of the amount certified from the Municipal Aid Fund
to the Arkansas Real Property Reappraisal Fund. In no event shall the total
amount of funds transferred as authorized herein exceed fourteen million two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($14,250,000) in a single fiscal year.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
01/07/2025 11:02:38 AM JAP006

SB43
FUND TRANSFERS. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Assessment Coordination Division is authorized to transfer funds during the
2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account
designated for support of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Assessment Coordination Division to the Real Property Reappraisal Fund. The
total of all transfers shall not exceed $1,500,000.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER PROVISION. After receiving approval from the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Assessment Coordination Division is authorized to transfer appropriation from
the Operating Expenses line item in the State Operations Program to the
Assessor’s School special line item to assure sufficient resources are
available to provide required training for assessment personnel.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 11. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
01/07/2025 11:02:38 AM JAP006

SB43
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.





















01/07/2025 11:02:38 AM JAP006